Hawaii, session 2025, HB732.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 205A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§205A-     Development valuation threshold; establishment; adjustment; notice.  (a)  Beginning January 1, 2025, the development valuation threshold shall be $750,000. (b)  No later than , 2025, and every year thereafter, the lead agency shall annually increase the development valuation threshold that applied for the preceding year by the same percentage of increase, if any, of the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor over the previous calendar year. The revised development valuation threshold shall apply beginning on January 1 of the immediately succeeding calendar year. (c)  No later than , 2025, and every year thereafter, the lead agency shall notify the authority in each county of the development valuation threshold applicable for the immediately succeeding calendar year." SECTION 2.  Section 205A-22, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1. By adding a new definition to be appropriately inserted and to read: ""Development valuation threshold" means the development valuation amount to be applied pursuant to section 205A-   ." 2. By amending the definition of "special management area minor permit" to read: ""Special management area minor permit" means an action by the authority authorizing development [the valuation of which is not in excess of $500,000 and which] that is valued at or below the development valuation threshold and that has no substantial adverse environmental or ecological effect, taking into account potential cumulative effects." 3. By amending the definition of "special management area use permit" to read: ""Special management area use permit" means an action by the authority authorizing development [the valuation of which exceeds $500,000] that is valued over the development valuation threshold or [which] that may have a substantial adverse environmental or ecological effect, taking into account potential cumulative effects." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________